District of Columbia statutes.
50-1401.01a

Notification of operator’s permit expiration.

The Mayor shall notify an owner of the expiration date of the owner’s operator’s permit. The required notice shall be mailed to the named owner at the address of record at least 30 days prior to the date of expiration.

Mar. 3, 1925, ch. 443, § 7a
as added Apr. 8, 2005, D.C. Law 15-307, § 702, 52 DCR 1700

History